Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3212
Registration of securities; name of nominee.

A corporation acting as one of two or more fiduciaries, with the consent of its cofiduciary or cofiduciaries, who are hereby authorized to give such consent, may register a security held by said fiduciaries in the name of its nominee, subject in all respects to the requirements, provisions and liabilities set forth in section 30-3211.

Laws 1947, c. 80, § 2, p. 254;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-605.